Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 4

Alcohol Abuse Prevention

33-10-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Alcohol Abuse Prevention Act of 1990,” and shall establish programs and procedures to permit the detention and treatment of persons intoxicated or incapacitated by alcohol.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-501; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 26; T.C.A. § 68-24-501.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 26 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-501 to § 33-10-501; however, § 68-24-501 was transferred to § 33-10-401 by the code commission.

33-10-402. Application of part.

This part shall be an alternative to part 2 of this chapter. This part shall apply to a county and shall take effect only upon adoption of a resolution by the county legislative body electing to establish programs and procedures for the detention and treatment of such persons in that county pursuant to this part and to provide appropriate first year funding for those programs.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-502; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 27; T.C.A. § 68-24-502.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 27 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-502 to § 33-10-502; however, § 68-24-502 was transferred to § 33-10-402 by the code commission.

33-10-403. Legislative policy and findings.

It is the policy of this state that intoxicated persons should be afforded a continuum of treatment so they might lead normal lives as productive members of society.

The general assembly finds that alcoholism and intoxication are matters of statewide concern.

The general assembly recognizes the character and pervasiveness of alcohol abuse and alcoholism and that public intoxication and alcoholism are health problems that should be handled by public health rather than criminal procedures, when proper facilities, procedures and services as defined and set forth in this part are available.

The general assembly finds that this health problem has been seriously neglected and that the costs and the waste of human resources caused by alcohol abuse and alcoholism are massive, tragic and no longer acceptable.

The general assembly finds that the best interests of this state demand a locally-oriented attack on the massive alcohol abuse and alcoholism problem.

The general assembly finds that the handling of intoxicated persons as criminals contributes to jail overcrowding and the consumption of resources needed for the handling of more serious and violent matters.

The general assembly finds that there is a need for alternative programs in this state for the detention and treatment of persons intoxicated or incapacitated by alcohol.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-503; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 28; T.C.A. § 68-24-503

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 28 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-503 to § 33-10-503; however, § 68-24-503 was transferred to § 33-10-403 by the code commission.

33-10-404. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Approved private treatment facility” means a private agency meeting the standards prescribed by the department and licensed by the department of mental health and substance abuse services;

“Approved public social services facility” means a not-for-profit social services agency meeting the standards prescribed by the local courts acting in consultation with the county health department;

“Approved public treatment facility” means a not-for-profit treatment agency operating under the direction and control of or approved by the health department of any county to which this part applies or providing treatment under this part through a contract with the department and licensed by the department of mental health and substance abuse services;

“Custodial health officer” means an employee of the county health department trained in detecting intoxication or incapacitation, or both, of persons due to the consumption of alcohol or drugs, or both, and also trained in the proper handling and transport of those persons;

“Department” means the health department of any county to which this part applies;

“Director” means the director of the health department of any county to which this part applies;

“Health professional” means a person trained and licensed in the health sciences, including medical doctors, registered nurses and licensed practical nurses;

“Incapacitated by alcohol” means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol, is unconscious or that the person's judgment is otherwise so impaired that the person is incapable of realizing and making a rational decision with respect to the person's need for treatment, is unable to take care of the person's basic personal needs or safety or lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate rational decisions concerning the person's welfare;

“Intoxicated person” or “person intoxicated by alcohol” means any person who meets a condition or the conditions set forth in § 39-17-310;

“Licensed physician” means either a physician licensed by this state or a hospital-licensed physician employed by the admitting facility;

“Magistrate” or “judicial commissioner” means those officials as defined by § 40-5-101 or created by § 40-5-201; and

“Treatment” means the broad range of emergency, outpatient, intermediate and inpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation, medical, psychiatric, psychological care or social service care, or both, vocational rehabilitation or career counseling, or both, that may be extended to alcoholics and intoxicated persons.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 3; 1991, ch. 376, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-504; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2009, ch. 186, § 29; T.C.A. § 68-24-504; Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 24; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 29 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-504 to § 33-10-504; however, § 68-24-504 was transferred to § 33-10-404 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-10-405.
Counties — Powers.

To carry out the purposes of this part, counties may:

Make any contract necessary or incidental to the implementation of this part, including contracts with public and private not-for-profit agencies, organizations and individuals to provide funds for services rendered or furnished to alcoholics or intoxicated persons;

Solicit and accept any gift or grant of money, services or property from any private source or from the state or federal government or any agencies or any political subdivision of state or federal government, and cooperate in making application for such grants;

Coordinate activities, cooperate with alcoholism programs and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, local or private agencies in this state and other states for the treatment of alcoholics and intoxicated persons pursuant to this part;

Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics;

Acquire, hold or dispose of real property or any interest in real property and construct, lease or otherwise provide treatment facilities or social services facilities for alcoholics and intoxicated persons; and

Do whatever is necessary or convenient to execute the authority expressly granted in this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 4; 1991, ch. 376, § 3; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-505; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 30; T.C.A. § 68-24-505.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 30 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-505 to § 33-10-505; however, § 68-24-505 was transferred to § 33-10-405 by the code commission.

33-10-406. Persons charged with or convicted of a crime — Admission to treatment.

A person charged with or convicted of a crime may be admitted under § 33-6-201 to an appropriate treatment resource in accordance with the law relating to probation, parole or other disposition of persons charged with or convicted of criminal offenses.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 5; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-506; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 8E; 2009, ch. 186, § 31; T.C.A. § 68-24-506.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 31 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-506 to § 33-10-506; however, § 68-24-506 was transferred to § 33-10-406 by the code commission.

33-10-407. Persons intoxicated or incapacitated by alcohol — County provision of treatment and housing in lieu of arrest.

Any county may, pursuant to this part, provide facilities and services for the treatment or housing, or both, of a person intoxicated or incapacitated, or both, by alcohol in lieu of arrest. In such county or counties, when any person is intoxicated or incapacitated by alcohol and is clearly dangerous to the health and safety of the person or others, the person may be taken into protective custody by law enforcement authorities or custodial health officers, acting with probable cause, and taken to an approved treatment or social services facility. For purposes of determining whether a person is clearly dangerous to the person's health and safety, the degree of intoxication alone is sufficient, if the enforcement officer reasonably believes that the individual is unable to avoid severe impairment or injury from specific risks by or as a result of intoxication.

In determining whether a person should be taken to a treatment or social services facility in lieu of arrest under subsection (a), the law enforcement officer or custodial health officer shall consider all of the following:

Whether the person is likely to engage in a violation of the law while being transported to the treatment or social services facility or while at the facility;

The type of services available at the treatment or social services facility that are not readily available at the jail to which the person would be taken upon arrest;

Whether the treatment or social services facility has space available; and

The amenability of the person to the treatment or services provided by the treatment or social services facility.

A law enforcement officer or custodial health officer, in detaining the person, is taking the person into protective custody. In so doing, the detaining officer may use reasonable protective methods but shall make every reasonable effort to protect the detainee's health and safety. A taking into protective custody under this section is not an arrest and no entry or other records shall be made to indicate that the person has been arrested or charged with a crime. Any warrantless search conducted under this part is strictly limited by the circumstances justifying the search. A law enforcement officer or custodial health officer who acts in compliance with this section is acting in the course of official duties and shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for the officer's actions.

The law enforcement officer or custodial health officer shall, upon presenting the detained person to the treatment or social services facility, make written application for the detainee's evaluation and treatment at the facility. The application shall be directed to the administrator of the facility and shall state the circumstances requiring evaluation, detention and treatment, including the applicant's personal observations and the specific statements of other persons having relevant knowledge of the person's intoxication or incapacitation, or both, and the danger posed to the person or others, upon which the officer relies in initially detaining the person and in making the application. A copy of the application shall be furnished to the person to be detained. The facility may adopt policies governing the eligibility and criteria for admission.

If the approved treatment or social services facility administrator or the administrator's designee, after examination by a health professional for the purpose of determining whether the person is intoxicated or incapacitated, or both, by alcohol, approves the application consistent with purposes of this part and the admission policies, the person may be detained for evaluation and treatment for such period of time as the grounds for the detention as stated in the application for admission exist.

However, without regard to the decision of the facility administrator, all persons detained under this part shall be presented to a magistrate or judicial commissioner without unnecessary delay, for the purpose of determining whether the person can be held and treated pursuant to this part. Also, without regard to the decision of the facility administrator or magistrate or judicial commissioner, any person who refuses treatment or evaluation or requests release shall be released immediately, unless the person is detained in accordance with chapter 6, part 4 of this title.

If the approved treatment or social services facility administrator, or the administrator's designee or the magistrate or judicial commissioner determines that the application fails to sustain the grounds for detention as set forth in subsection (a), the application for detention shall be refused and the person detained shall be immediately released and the person shall be encouraged to seek voluntary treatment, if appropriate.

When the administrator, based upon the recommendation of the health professional, determines that the grounds for commitment no longer exist, the administrator shall discharge the person committed under this section, unless the person seeks and obtains voluntary treatment under § 33-6-201.

In those cases where involuntary commitment becomes necessary, such commitments shall be governed by chapter 3, part 6 of this title.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 6; 1991, ch. 376, § 4; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-507; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 8A, 8E; 2009, ch. 186, § 32; T.C.A. § 68-24-507.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 32 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-507 to § 33-10-507; however, § 68-24-507 was transferred to § 33-10-407 by the code commission.

33-10-408. Registration and records of treatment facilities — Confidentiality — Exception.

The registration and other records of treatment facilities shall remain confidential and are privileged.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the director may make available information from patients' records for purposes of research into the causes and treatment of alcoholism. Information under this subsection (b) shall not be published in a way that discloses patients' names or other identifying information.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 7; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-508; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 33; T.C.A. § 68-24-508.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 33 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-508 to § 33-10-508; however, § 68-24-508 was transferred to § 33-10-408 by the code commission.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-10-409.
Patients in treatment or social services facilities — Visitation and communication — Patients' rights — Detention.

Patients in any approved treatment or social services facility shall be granted opportunities for visitation and communication with their families and friends consistent with an effective treatment program. Patients shall be permitted to consult with counsel at any time. In determining whether to detain a person under this part, the facility administrator shall also give due consideration to the immediate effect on the individual's employment and shall detain the individual only when the individual's immediate welfare dictates.

Neither mail nor other communication to or from a patient in any approved treatment or social services facility may be intercepted, read or censored. The approved treatment or social services facility may adopt reasonable policies regarding the use of the telephone in the facility.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 8; 1991, ch. 376, § 5; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-509; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 34; T.C.A. § 68-24-509.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 34 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-509 to § 33-10-509; however, § 68-24-509 was transferred to § 33-10-409 by the code commission.

33-10-410. Public intoxication or drunkenness — Arrests and court proceedings.

All arrests and court proceedings for public intoxication or drunkenness in this state shall be pursuant to § 39-17-310, to the exclusion of any common law or statutory offense now being enforced.

No county, municipality or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt any local law, ordinance, resolution or regulation having the force of law rendering public intoxication or drunkenness, in and of itself, or being a common drunkard or being found in enumerated places in an intoxicated condition, an offense, a violation of which is the subject of criminal or civil penalties or sanctions of any kind.

Nothing contained in subsection (b) shall affect any laws, ordinances, resolutions or regulations against drunken driving, driving under the influence of alcohol or other similar offenses that involve the operation of motor vehicles, machinery or other hazardous equipment.

Any fines collected under § 39-17-310 shall be retained by the unit of local government over which the court has jurisdiction.

Acts 1990, ch. 639, § 9; 1993, ch. 234, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-8-510; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 35; T.C.A. § 68-24-510.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 35 purported to transfer this section from § 68-24-510 to § 33-10-510; however, § 68-24-510 was transferred to § 33-10-410 by the code commission.